tr: Yumuşak yem tarzı: Kerevit; Yaratık; Kurbağa; Kurtçuk; Domuz; Hibrit; Böcek/Örümcek; Jerkbait/Fluke; Kertenkele; Ned rig; Ahtapot etekli; Kürek kuyruklu; Semender; Shad; Karides; Çatal kuyruklu; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Treyler; Tüp; Solucan; Diğer
fi: Pehmeän vieheen tyyli: Rapu; Ötökkä; Sammakko; Toukka; Hog; Hybridi; Hyönteinen/Hämähäkki; Jerkki/Fluke; Lisko; Ned-rigi; Mustekalahame; Lapiopyrstö; Salamanteri; Shad; Katkarapu; Haarapyrstö; Stickbait/Senko; Swimbait; Traileri; Putki; Mato; Muu
pt-PT: Tipo de isca de plástico macio: Lagostim; Criatura; Rã; Larva; Hog; Híbrido; Inseto/aranha; Jerkbait/fluke; Lagarto; Ned rig; Saia de polvo; Cauda de remo; Salamandra; Shad; Camarão/gamba; Cauda dividida; Stick bait/senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tubo; Minhoca; Outro
zh-TW: 軟餌釣法: 螯蝦型; 異形/生物型; 青蛙型; 蛆蟲型; 豬型; 混合型; 昆蟲/蜘蛛型; 抽搐餌/軟魚型; 蜥蜴型; Ned 釣組型; 章魚裙襬型; 槳尾型; 蠑螈型; 鰣魚型; 蝦型; 剪刀尾型; 棒狀/條蟲型; 泳餌型; 附加餌型; 管狀餌; 蠕蟲型; 其他
lt-LT: Minkšto masalo stilius: Vėžiagyvis; Būtybė; Varlė; Lerva; „Hog“ tipo; Hibridinis; Vabzdys / voras; „Jerkbait“ / „Fluke“; Driežas; „Ned rig“; Aštuonkojo sijonėlis; Irklo formos uodegėlė; Salamandra; Žuvelė („Shad“); Krevetė; Skelta uodegėlė; Lazdelė / „Senko“; Guminukas-žuvelė („Swimbait“); Papildomas masalas („Trailer“); Vamzdelis; Sliekas; Kita
fr: Forme du leurre souple: Écrevisse; Créature; Grenouille; Larve (Grub); Hog; Hybride; Insecte/Araignée; Jerkbait/Fluke; Lézard; Montage Ned; Jupe octopus; Paddle tail; Salamandre; Shad; Crevette; Queue fendue; Stickbait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Ver; Autre
en: Soft bait style: Craw; Creature; Frog; Grub; Hog; Hybrid; Insect/Spider; Jerkbait/Fluke; Lizard; Ned rig; Octopus skirt; Paddle tail; Salamander; Shad; Shrimp/Prawn; Split tail; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Worm; Other
sv: Mjuk betestil: Kräfta; Kreatur; Groda; Grub; Hog; Hybrid; Insekt/spindel; Jerkbait/Fluke; Ödla; Ned-rig; Bläckfiskkjol; Paddelstjärt; Salamander; Shad; Räka; Kluven stjärt; Stickbait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Mask; Övrigt
ja: ソフトベイトスタイル: クロー; クリーチャー; フロッグ; グラブ; ホッグ; ハイブリッド; インセクト / スパイダー; ジャークベイト / フルーク; リザード; ネドリグ; タコベイト; パドルテール; サラマンダー; シャッド; シュリンプ / プローン; スプリットテール; スティックベイト / センコー; スイムベイト; トレーラー; チューブ; ワーム; その他
es: Estilo de señuelo blando: Cangrejo; Criatura; Rana; Larva; Hog; Híbrido; Insecto o araña; Jerkbait o fluke; Lagartija; Aparejo Ned; Falda de pulpo; Cola de pala; Salamandra; Sábalo; Camarón o langostino; Cola dividida; Stick bait o Senko; Swimbait; Remolque; Tubo; Lombriz; Otro
nb: Myk agnstil: Kreps; Creature; Frosk; Grub; Hog; Hybrid; Insekt/edderkopp; Jerkbait/fluke; Øgle; Ned-rig; Blekksprutskjørt; Padlehale; Salamander; Shad; Reke; Splithale; Stickbait/senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Orm; Annet
it: Stile di esca morbida: Craw; Creatura; Rana; Grub; Hog; Ibrida; Insetto/ragno; Jerkbait/Fluke; Lucertola; Ned rig; Gonnellino octopus; Paddle tail; Salamandra; Shad; Gamberetto/Gambero; Split tail; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tubo; Verme; Altro
de: Stil des Weichköders: Krebs; Creature-Bait; Frosch; Grub; Hog; Hybrid; Insekt/Spinne; Jerkbait/Fluke; Lizard; Ned Rig; Oktopus-Fransen; Schaufelschwanz; Salamander; Shad; Garnele; V-Schwanz; Stickbait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Wurm; Andere
hu: Puha horgászcsali stílusa: Rák; Fantázia; Béka; Lárva; Hog; Hibrid; Rovar/Pók; Jerkbait/Fluke; Gyík; Ned rig; Polipszoknya; Korongfarkú; Szalamandra; Shad; Garnélarák; Osztott farkú; Stickbait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Féreg; Egyéb
pt-BR: Isca macia estilo: Lagostim; Criatura; Sapo; Grub; Hog; Híbrido; Inseto/Aranha; Jerkbait/Fluke; Lagarto; Ned rig; Saia Octopus; Cauda Paddle; Salamandra; Shad; Camarão; Cauda dividida; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tubo; Minhoca; Outro
th: ประเภทของเหยื่ออ่อน: กุ้งก้ามกราม; สัตว์ประหลาด; กบ; หนอนหางเดี่ยว; หมู; ไฮบริด; แมลง/แมงมุม; เจิร์กเบท/ฟลุ๊ก; กิ้งก่า; เน็ดริก; พู่หมึก; หางพาย; ซาลาแมนเดอร์; แชด; กุ้ง; หางแฉก; สติกเบท/เซนโกะ; สวิมเบท; เทรลเลอร์; ท่อ; หนอน; อื่นๆ
pl: Styl miękkiej przynęty: Rak (craw); Kreatura (creature); Żaba (frog); Twister (grub); Hog; Hybryda; Owad / pająk; Jaskółka (jerkbait/fluke); Jaszczurka; Ned rig; Ośmiorniczka; Kopyto (paddle tail); Salamandra; Riper (shad); Krewetka; Rozwidlony ogon (split tail); Stickbait / Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tuba (tube); Robak (worm); Inny
da: Softbait-stil: Krebs; Creature; Frø; Grub; Hog; Hybrid; Insekt/edderkop; Jerkbait/Fluke; Firben; Ned rig; Blæksprutteskørt; Paddletail; Salamander; Shad; Reje; Splittail; Stickbait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Orm; Andet
el: Στυλ μαλακού δολώματος: Καραβίδα; Πλάσμα; Βάτραχος; Σκουλήκι/Κάμπια; Hog; Υβριδικό; Έντομο/Αράχνη; Jerkbait/Fluke; Σαύρα; Ned rig; Χταπόδι/Φούστα; Paddle tail; Σαλαμάνδρα; Shad; Γαρίδα; Split tail; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Σκουλήκι; Άλλο
ko: 소프트베이트 스타일: 크로우; 크리처; 프로그; 그럽; 호그; 하이브리드; 곤충/거미; 저크베이트/플루크; 리자드; 네드 리그; 옥토퍼스 스커트; 패들 테일; 샐러맨더; 섀드; 새우; 스플릿 테일; 스틱 베이트/센코; 스윔베이트; 트레일러; 튜브; 웜; 기타
sk-SK: Štýl mäkkej nástrahy: Rak; Potvora; Žaba; Twister; Hog; Hybrid; Hmyz/Pavúk; Jerkbait/Fluke; Jašterica; Ned rig; Chobotnica; Kopyto; Salamandra; Shad; Kreveta; Rozdvojený chvost; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Červ; Iný
ru: Стиль мягкой приманки: Рачок; Креатура; Лягушка; Твистер; Хог; Гибрид; Насекомое/паук; Джеркбейт/флюк; Ящерица; Нед-риг; Октопус; Виброхвост; Саламандра; Шед; Креветка; Раздвоенный хвост; Стикбейт/сенко; Свимбейт; Трейлер; Трубка; Червь; Другое
hr-HR: Stil mekog mamca: Rak (Craw); Kreatura (Creature); Žaba; Crv; Hog; Hibrid; Kukac/pauk; Jerkbait/Fluke; Gušter; Ned rig; Suknja hobotnice; Paddle tail; Daždevnjak; Shad; Kozica/škamp; Rascijepljeni rep; Stick bait / Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tuba; Glista; Ostalo
cs: Styl měkké návnady: Rak; Kreatura; Žába; Červ; Nymfa; Hybridní; Hmyz/pavouk; Jerkbait/smáček; Ještěrka; Ned rig; Chobotnička; Kopyto; Mlok; Shad; Kreveta; Rozdvojený ocas; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Trubička; Žížala; Jiné
ro-RO: Stil de nălucă moale: Rac; Creatură; Broască; Vierme; Hog; Hibrid; Insectă/păianjen; Jerkbait/Fluke; Șopârlă; Ned rig; Fustă de caracatiță; Coadă tip vâslă; Salamandră; Shad; Crevete; Coadă despicată; Stick bait/Senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tub; Râmă; Altele
vi: Kiểu mồi mềm: Tôm hùm đất; Sinh vật; Ếch; Sùng; Bọ; Lai; Côn trùng/Nhện; Cá giả; Thằn lằn; Ned rig; Váy bạch tuộc; Đuôi chèo; Kỳ giông; Cá mòi; Tôm; Đuôi chẻ; Mồi gậy/Senko; Mồi cá bơi; Mồi phụ; Mồi ống; Giun; Khác
bg-BG: Стил на меката примамка: Рак (Craw); Същество; Жаба; Личинка (Grub); Hog; Хибрид; Насекомо/паяк; Джеркбейт/флук; Гущер; Ned rig; Поличка тип октопод; Лопатовидна опашка; Саламандър; Шад (Shad); Скарида; Разделена опашка; Стикбейт/Senko; Суимбейт (Swimbait); Трейлър; Туба; Червей; Друго
nl: Softbait stijl: Craw; Creature; Kikker; Grub; Hog; Hybride; Insect/spin; Jerkbait/fluke; Hagedis; Ned-rig; Octopus skirt; Paddle tail; Salamander; Shad; Garnaal; Split tail; Stickbait/senko; Swimbait; Trailer; Tube; Worm; Anders
zh-CN: 软饵类型: 小龙虾软饵; 异形软饵; 软青蛙; 蛆型软饵; 猪型软饵; 混合型; 昆虫/蜘蛛软饵; 抽停/小鱼软饵; 蜥蜴软饵; 奈德钓组软饵; 章鱼裙摆; 卷尾; 蝾螈软饵; 鲱鱼软饵; 虾软饵; 分尾软饵; 棒状/面条虫; 泳饵; 附加软饵; 管状软饵; 蠕虫软饵; 其他
sl-SI: Stil mehke vabe: Rak; Posebne oblike; Žaba; Ličinka; Prašiček; Hibrid; Žuželka/pajek; Vaba Jerkbait/Fluke; Kuščar; Sistem Ned; Oblika hobotnice; Z repom v obliki vesla; Močerad; Čepa; Rakica/kozica; Deljeni rep; Paličasta vaba/Senko; Plavajoča vaba; Prikolica; Cev; Črv; Drugo